dev/verb/verb.bn.dix
    <pardef n="প/ার__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছিলাম</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছিল</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pcnd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারবে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারল</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছিল</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppst"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারবেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারবে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারবেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারবে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারলি</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ার</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারতে থাকব</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছিল</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারবেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছিল</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারব</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছিল</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারতে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছিলাম</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারলে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারলে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারিস</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারি</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছি</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছিলি</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারলেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারবে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারা</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারতেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ার</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারিস</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারত</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছিস</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ার</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছিলেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছিলে</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারছ</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছিস</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ারুন</l>
          <r>ার<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েরেছেন</l>

    <e lm="পার"><i>প</i><par n="প/ার__vblex"/></e>
